Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.290

Prearrangement contracts—Registration—Renewal—Fees—Disposition.

All certificates of registration issued pursuant to this chapter shall continue in force until the expiration date unless suspended or revoked. A certificate shall be subject to renewal annually ninety days after the end of its fiscal year, as stated on the original application, by the funeral establishment and payment of the required fees.

The director shall determine and collect fees related to certificate of registration licensure.

All fees so collected shall be remitted by the director to the state treasurer not later than the first business day following receipt of such funds and the funds shall be credited to the funeral directors and embalmers account.

[ 1993 c 43 s 1; 1986 c 259 s 69; 1982 c 66 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date of 1993 c 43—1993 sp.s. c 24: "Chapter 43, Laws of 1993 is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 931.]

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective dates—Transfer of records, files, and pending business—Savings—1982 c 66: See notes following RCW 18.39.240.